en: white round rice
fr: riz rond blanc, Riz rond blanchi
nl: witte ronde rijst, ronde rijst wit

en: organic white round rice
fr: riz rond blanc bio

en: semi-whole round rice
fr: riz rond semi-complet, riz rond complet légèrement poli
hr: polucijela okrugla riža
nl: halfvolkoren ronde rijst, volkoren ronde rijst lichtjes gepolijst

en: whole round rice
fr: riz rond complet
hr: cijela okrugla riža
it: riso tondo integrale
nl: volkoren ronde rijst

en: superior quality round rice
fr: riz rond de qualité supérieure

en: organic superior quality round rice
fr: riz rond biologique de qualité supérieure

en: risotto rice
bg: ориз за ризото
de: Risotto-Reis
es: arroz de risotto
fi: risottoriisi
fr: riz pour risotto, riz à risotto
hr: riža za rižoto
hu: rizottó rizs
it: riso per risotto
pt: arroz risotto

en: wild rice
de: Wildreis
es: arroz salvaje
fi: villiriisi, intiaaniriisi
fr: riz sauvage
hr: divlja riža
hu: vadrizs
it: riso selvatico
la: Zizania
nl: wilde rijst
pl: ryż dziki
pt: arroz selvagem
sv: vildris

en: cooked wild rice
fr: riz sauvage cuit

en: black wild rice
de: schwarzer Wildreis
fr: riz sauvage noir
hr: crna divlja riža
hu: fekete vadrizs
it: riso selvatico nero
nl: zwarte wilde rijst

en: red rice
ar: أرز أحمر
bg: червен ориз
de: roter Reis
es: arroz rojo, arroz colorado
fi: punainen riisi, punariisi
fr: riz rouge
hr: crvena riža
hu: vörös rizs
it: riso rosso
nl: rode rijst
pl: ryż czerwony
pt: arroz vermelho
th: ข้าวไรซ์เมอร์รี

en: red cargo rice
de: Roten Cargo Reis
el: κόκκινο ρύζι Cargo
es: arroz rojo cargo
fi: punainen cargo-riisi
fr: riz cargo rouge
hr: crvena teretna riža
it: riso ross cargo
nl: rode cargo rijst
th: ข้าวกล้องแดง
vi: gạo lứt dỏ, gạo nâu đõ
zh: 红糙米

en: black rice
bg: черен ориз
bn: কালো চাল
de: schwarzer Reis
es: arroz negro
fr: riz noir
he: אורז שחור
hr: crna riža
hu: fekete rizs
it: riso nero
ja: 黒米
jv: Beras ireng
ko: 흑미
mr: काळा तांदूळ
pl: czarny ryż
ta: கருப்பு அரிசி
vi: gạo nếp cẩm
zh: 紫米

en: basmati rice, basmati
ar: بسمتي
bg: ориз басмати, басмати
bn: বাসমতী
br: basmati
ca: arròs Basmati, basmati
cs: basmati, basmati rýže
da: basmatiris
de: Basmatireis, Basmati Reis
eo: Basmatio
es: arroz basmati
fa: باسماتی
fi: Basmatiriisi
fr: riz basmati
gl: Basmati
he: אורז בסמטי
hi: बासमती चावल
hr: basmati riža
hu: basmati rizs, basmati, baszmati rizs
it: riso Basmati
ja: バスマティ
ko: 바스마티
ml: ബസുമതി
ms: Beras basmati
nl: basmatirijst
pl: ryż Basmati
pt: basmati
ru: Басмати
sd: باسپتي
sv: basmatiris
ta: பாசுமதி
te: బాస్మతి బియ్యం
th: บาสมาตี
uk: басматі

en: white basmati rice
da: hvidt basmatiris
de: weißer Basmatireis
fi: valkoinen basmatiriisi
fr: riz basmati blanc, riz blanc long grain basmati, riz thaï blanc
hr: bijela basmati riža
hu: fehér basmati rizs, fehér baszmati rizs
it: riso basmati bianco
nl: witte basmatirijst
sv: vitt basmatiris

en: brown basmati rice
da: brunt basmatiris
de: brauner Basmatireis
fi: tumma basmatiriisi
fr: riz basmati complet
hr: smeđa basmati riža
hu: barna basmati rizs, barna baszmati rizs
it: riso basmati integrale
nl: volkoren basmati rijst
sv: brunt basmatiris

en: long grain basmati rice
bg: дългозърнест басмати ориз
de: Langkorn Basmatireis
es: arroz basmati de grano largo
fi: pitkäjyväinen basmatiriisi
fr: riz Basmati long grain, riz long basmati, riz long grain basmati
hr: basmati riža dugog zrna
hu: hosszú szemű basmati rizs, hosszú szemű baszmati rizs
it: Riso basmati di grano lungo
nl: langkorrelige basmatirijst

en: superior quality long grain Basmati rice, high quality long grain Basmati rice
de: Langkorn Basmatireis spitzenqualität
fr: riz basmati long grain de qualité supérieure, riz long grain Basmati de qualité supérieure, riz long basmati de qualite superieure
hr: visokokvalitetna basmati riža dugog zrna
it: riso basmati a grani lunghi di alta qualità
nl: langkorrelige basmatirijst van hoogwaardige kwaliteit

fr: riz basmati précuit
de: basmati Reis gegart
fi: parboil-käsitelty basmatiriisi

en: cooked basmati rice
de: Basmati-Reis gekocht
fi: keitetty basmatiriisi, kypsennetty basmatiriisi
fr: riz basmati cuit
it: riso Basmati cotto
nl: gekookte basmatirijst